California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(2) Information on the provisions of subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 8235. 

(c) Failure to receive the notice under this section does not exempt or excuse the owner from the requirement of annual renewal of the permit on or before the permit expiration date.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1164, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8238.

(a) On or before January 1, 1991, the department, in consultation with the commercial salmon fishing review board, created pursuant to former Section 8247, shall establish and adopt, in the manner prescribed in former Section 8238.3, as that section read on January 1, 1991,
 a vessel classification system to determine
 the fishing potential of prospective vessels for applications for new, original permits.

(b) Commencing January 1, 2020, for applications to transfer a permit to a replacement vessel, the department shall determine the fishing potential of the permitted vessel and the replacement vessel by multiplying the length of the vessel by the breadth of the vessel by the depth of the vessel based on figures provided to the department in a vessel marine survey conducted by a licensed marine surveyor or on a current certificate of documentation issued by the United States Coast Guard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 472, Sec. 4.   (SB 262)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8238.1.

The vessel classification system shall be used by the department for issuance of new original vessel permits pursuant to Section 8243.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 472, Sec. 5.   (SB 262)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8239.

A transfer may be approved and a permit issued for use of a replacement vessel pursuant to Section 8241 under all of the following conditions:

(a) The vessel owner submits a written request for the transfer to the department on a form provided by the department and pays a nonrefundable transfer fee of two hundred dollars ($200).

(b) The permit for the permitted vessel is current, and the owner of the permitted vessel makes assurances in the application that any renewal of the permit that
 becomes due during the application processing period will be made.

(c) Proof of ownership is submitted to the department for the permitted vessel and replacement vessel.

(d) The vessel owner submits
 a vessel marine survey conducted by a licensed marine surveyor or a current certificate of documentation issued by the United States Coast Guard that contains the necessary information for the department to establish that the replacement vessel has the same fishing potential as, or less fishing potential than, the permitted vessel.

(e) Under penalty of perjury, the vessel owner signs the application for transfer and certifies that the included information is true to the best of
 their information and belief.

(f) The same transfer has not been requested within the previous 12 months or the same transfer has not previously been denied and that denial is final, unless the application or supporting information are different than that contained in the previous application, as determined by the department.

(g) Except as provided in Section 8239.1, the permit has not been transferred to a replacement vessel during the same permit year.

(h) The permittee has written authority from the legal owner, if other than the permittee or mortgager, if any, to transfer the vessel permit from the permitted vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 472, Sec. 6.   (SB 262)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8239.1.

Unless otherwise prohibited, the department shall accept a transfer application within two years after the date that a permitted vessel was lost, stolen, or destroyed, notwithstanding any inability to physically examine the permitted vessel to determine its salmon fishing potential. Only the permittee at the time of the loss, theft, or destruction of the vessel may apply for the transfer of the vessel permit. Proof that a
 vessel is lost, stolen, or destroyed shall be in the form of a copy of the report filed with the United States Coast Guard or any other law enforcement agency or fire department investigating the loss. The department shall only transfer a permit pursuant to this section if the permit remains valid during the entire period following the loss, theft, or destruction, and while the transfer application is pending. If the permittee does not submit a transfer application within two years after the permitted vessel was lost, stolen, or destroyed, or if the department denies the transfer application later than two years after a permitted vessel was lost, stolen, or destroyed, the permit is null and void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 472, Sec. 7.   (SB 262)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8239.6.

A permit issued for the use of a replacement vessel under Section 8241 is valid for the balance of the permit year for which the permit for the use of the permitted vessel was originally issued or last renewed, and the permit issued under this section authorizes the use of the replacement vessel only for that period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1164, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8240.

(a) The department shall not issue a permit for use of a replacement vessel if the permitted vessel was reported as lost, stolen, or destroyed by fraudulent means or for fraudulent purposes.

(b) The department shall not issue a permit for use of a replacement vessel if the application contains or is accompanied with fraudulent or willfully misleading information.

(c) The department shall not issue a permit for use of a replacement vessel or to a new owner of a permitted vessel if the permit for the permitted vessel expires and is not renewed. Except as provided in Section 8235, an owner of a permitted vessel shall renew the permit before the expiration date even if that owner has a transfer application pending.

(d) The department may refuse to issue a permit for use of a replacement vessel or to issue a permit to a new owner of a permitted vessel on any grounds for which a permit may be suspended or revoked.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1164, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8241.

The department shall issue the permit for use of a replacement vessel if it determines that the conditions specified in Section 8239 have been satisfied and the replacement vessel has the same fishing potential as, or less fishing potential than, the permitted vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 472, Sec. 10.   (SB 262)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8242.

A person seeking to gain entry into the commercial salmon fishery may obtain a permit under either of the following conditions:

(a) By legally obtaining the ownership of a permitted vessel and notifying the department of the change of ownership of the permitted vessel.

(b) By applying to obtain a new, original permit issued by the department pursuant to Sections 8244 and 8245.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1164, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8243.

(a) If the department determines that the number of permitted vessels is less than 2,500, the department shall determine the number and vessel classification for which any new, original permits may be issued to bring the total number of permitted vessels to no more than 2,500.

(b) New, original permits to be issued shall be authorized by vessel classifications established under Section 8238.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 472, Sec. 11.   (SB 262)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8244.

(a) An applicant may apply for a new, original permit as an individual, a joint venture, or a corporation. The applicant may submit only one application annually. The application shall be made on a form provided by the department.

(b) An applicant for a new, original permit under this section shall submit a completed application as directed by the department. The completed application, and the application fees prescribed in subdivision (c), shall be delivered or postmarked on or before February 1 in order to be considered for permits for the subsequent permit year.

(c) The applicant shall submit with the application a nonrefundable application fee determined
 by the department in an amount sufficient to pay the costs of administering the issuance of new, original permits by the department, which shall be not less than thirty-five dollars ($35).

(d) The department shall determine the fishing potential of the vessel for use of which the new, original permit is to be issued and otherwise determine if the applicant is eligible to be issued a permit under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 472, Sec. 12.   (SB 262)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8245.

(a) The department shall conduct a drawing from the applicants determined to be eligible for new, original permits pursuant to Section 8244 on the first Friday in March of each year that new, original permits are authorized to be issued pursuant to Section 8243.

(b) (1) The department shall issue a permit to each of those applicants who are drawn upon payment of the fees prescribed in paragraph (2) for the permit and, except as provided in subdivision (d), submittal of sufficient information to establish that the applicant is the owner of a vessel within the vessel classification designated in the application.

(2) The amount of the fees
 for a permit issued under this section are the same as the amount of the fees for renewal of a permit for the subsequent license year beginning on April 1 that are established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8235. A successful applicant shall pay the fees for the permit on or before March 31. The department shall deposit the fees to the fund pursuant to Section 13001.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), a successful applicant shall submit proof of ownership of the vessel to be used under the permit within 90 days of the drawing.

(d) (1) A successful applicant may request one extension of no more than 90 days to obtain a vessel as designated in the
 application. The
 department may grant that extension.

(2) If any successful applicant does not establish that the applicant is the owner of a vessel as designated in the application and affix the new permit on that vessel or on another vessel with the same or less fishing potential, as determined by the department, within 90 days or by the end of a 90 day extension granted by the department, the new permit is null and void.

(3) The department
 is not liable for any risk of failure by the applicant to obtain a vessel that is designated in an application or to complete the process for determination of the fishing potential of another vessel, or for failure by the applicant to obtain that other vessel, in the time prescribed in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 472, Sec. 13.   (SB 262)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8246.

(a) At any time after notice of an order suspending or revoking of a person’s commercial salmon fishing privilege is issued by the commission, and before the order of suspension or revocation is final, the commission may, with the agreement of the person subject to the action, compromise or dismiss the action to suspend or revoke the commercial salmon fishing privilege in the best interests of the state, or the commission may compromise or dismiss the action with the agreement of the person subject to the action on terms and conditions, which may include, but are not limited to, the payment of civil damages, the reduction of a revocation to a suspension for a specified period of time, or any other terms and conditions.

(b) The commission, after notice and opportunity
 for hearing, may suspend or revoke the commercial fishing privilege, authorized under a license issued for the purposes of Section 7850, for any violation of a term or condition of an agreement to compromise or dismiss a separate suspension or revocation action that was made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) If the commission orders a suspension or revocation of a person’s commercial salmon fishing privilege, any permit issued pursuant to this article shall be renewed when the next renewal is due or the permit shall expire as provided in Section 8233.

(d) Subdivision (a) does not apply if an action is brought to recover civil damages under Section 2014 from the person subject to action under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 153.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8246.2.

(a) The commission, in consultation with the department, shall adopt regulations for the determination of civil damages provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 8246 that give due consideration to the appropriateness of the civil damages with respect to all of the following factors:

(1) The gravity of the violation.

(2) The good faith of the convicted licensee.

(3) The history of previous violations.

(4) The damage to the fishery.

(5) The cost of restoration of the fishery.

(b) Civil damages imposed under subdivision (a) of Section 8246 shall be due and payable on or before a date that is 30 days after the compromise is entered into.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 154.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8246.4.

The commission, after notice and opportunity for hearing, shall revoke a commercial salmon vessel permit issued pursuant to this article if the vessel permit was obtained by fraudulent means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 472, Sec. 17.   (SB 262)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8246.6.

A person whose commercial salmon fishing vessel permit is revoked by the commission or who has been denied a permit transfer may appeal the revocation or denial to the commission by submitting the appeal in writing to the commission within 60 days of the decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 525, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

8246.7.

(a) The commission shall reverse an order of revocation, order the permit renewed, or order the approval of a permit transfer only if it finds one of the following grounds:

(1) The permittee failed to submit an application and pay the fees for renewal on or before April 30 pursuant to Section 8235 and the failure to renew a permit until after the expiration date was due to death, physical illness, mental incapacity, or being called to active military duty, and the person was not reasonably able to have an agent renew the permit.

(2) A lienholder of a permitted vessel, if the vessel is the property of the lienholder as a result of foreclosure, surrender, or
 litigation, can show loss due to the nonrenewal of a permit by the permittee, and the nonrenewal occurred without the knowledge of the lienholder.

(3) If, in the case of permit revocation because of fraud, evidence is provided to the commission disputing the charges of fraud. If the commission finds there was no fraud after consideration of all of the evidence, the commission may order the revocation annulled, and, if the permit expiration date has passed during the pendency of the hearing on the appeal, the commission may order the department to renew the permit upon payment of the fees.

(4) The denial of the permit transfer was arbitrary or capricious.

(b) Each appeal shall be heard and considered separately on its own merits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 472, Sec. 18.   (SB 262)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8246.8.

The commission and the department may make and enforce regulations that may be necessary or convenient for carrying out any power, authority, or jurisdiction delegated to it under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1164, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8248.

If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are severable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1164, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Lobster [8250. - 8259.]

8250.

As used in this code, “spiny lobster” refers to the species Panulirus interruptus.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8250.5.

(a) Subject to this article and Article 1 (commencing with Section 9000) of Chapter 4, a lobster trap, as described in Section 9010, may be used to take lobster for commercial purposes under a lobster permit issued pursuant to Section 8254.

(b) The following species may be taken incidentally in lobster traps being fished under the authority of a lobster permit issued pursuant to Section 8254, and any other species taken incidentally shall be immediately released back to the water:

(1) Crab, other than Dungeness crab.

(2) Kellet’s whelk.

(3) Octopus.

(c) Spiny lobsters taken in the manner commonly known as skindiving or by a person using self-contained underwater breathing apparatus shall not be sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 119.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8251.

Spiny lobsters may be taken only between the first Wednesday in October and the first Wednesday after the 15th of March. Lobster traps may be set and baited 24 hours in advance of the opening date of the lobster season if no other attempt is made to take or possess the lobsters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1315.)
-------------------------------------------

8252.

No spiny lobster less than three and one-quarter inches in length measured in a straight line from the rear edge of the eye socket to the rear edge of the body shell, both points to be on the midline of the back, may be taken, possessed, purchased, or sold.

Every person taking spiny lobster shall carry a measuring device and shall measure any lobster immediately on removal from his trap and if it is found to be undersize the lobster shall be returned to the water immediately.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1315.)
-------------------------------------------

8253.

It is unlawful to pickle, can, or otherwise preserve any spiny lobster, but spiny lobsters may be preserved by freezing and may be cooked for consumption in the fresh state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8254.

(a) Lobsters shall not be taken for commercial purposes except under a valid lobster permit issued to that person that has not been suspended or revoked, subject to regulations adopted by the commission.

(b) Every person who takes, assists in taking, possesses, or transports lobsters for commercial purposes while on any boat, barge, or vessel, or who uses or operates or assists in using or operating any boat, net, trap, line, or other appliance to take lobsters for commercial purposes, shall have a valid lobster permit.

(c) The permit fee for a lobster permit is two hundred sixty-five dollars ($265).

(d) The fee for a lobster crewmember permit is one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).

(e) For the purposes of this section, it is prima facie evidence that lobster is taken for commercial purposes if the possession of lobster is more than three times the sport bag limit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 328, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8254.7.

When a complaint has been filed in a court of competent jurisdiction charging a holder of a commercial lobster permit with a violation of Section 8251 or 8252, and no disposition of the complaint has occurred within 90 days after it has been filed in the court, the department may suspend the commercial lobster permit of the person. The permitholder whose permit was suspended under this section may, within 10 days after the receipt of the suspension notice from the department, request a hearing, and, within 20 days after the request has been made, a hearing shall be held by the commission. A decision shall be made within a reasonable time on whether the suspension of the permit shall be terminated or continued until the disposition of the complaint by the court. In determining whether to terminate or continue the suspension of the permit, the commission shall consider whether or not the violation could have a detrimental effect on the resources and whether or not a continued suspension of the permit is in the best public interest, and shall find whether there is sufficient evidence that a violation has occurred. A failure to make a finding that there is sufficient evidence that a violation has occurred or a finding that there is insufficient evidence shall terminate the suspension of the permit under this section. If the permitholder is acquitted of the charges or the charges against him or her have been dismissed, any suspension of the permit is thereby terminated. No complaint shall be filed in a court charging a commercial lobster permitholder with a violation of Section 8251 or 8252 unless evidence supporting the charge has been reviewed by the appropriate county or city prosecuting agency and a criminal complaint has been issued by that agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1244, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

8257.

The permit number of the person owning or in command of any boat used to take lobster shall be visibly displayed on both sides of the boat in 10-inch black numbers, one inch wide, on a white background.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 195.)
-------------------------------------------

8258.

Lobster traps may be used to take spiny lobster in Districts 18, 19, 20A, and those portions of District 20 lying on the southerly side of Santa Catalina Island between Southeast Rock and China Point.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1271, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

8259.

Whenever it is necessary to prevent overutilization or to ensure efficient and economic operation of the fishery, the commission may limit the number of permits that may be issued pursuant to this article. As it determines appropriate to protect the resource, the commission may limit the number of permits on a statewide basis or within selected geographical areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 934, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Crab [8275. - 8285.]

8275.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this section govern the construction of this article.

(a) “Dungeness crab” or “market crab” means crab of the species Cancer magister.

(b) “Reconstruction” means major work on the hull of a vessel to make that vessel operable in the California crab fishery if that work may reasonably be expected to be of a duration that will preclude operation of that vessel in the crab fishery for the length of the crab season or longer.

(c) “Rock crab” means any crab of the genus Cancer other than Dungeness crab and includes rock crab (Cancer antennarius), red crab (Cancer productus), and yellow crab (Cancer anthonyi).

(d) “Under construction” means having plans and materials and proceeding with work toward the completion of an operational Dungeness crab fishing vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 870, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8276.

Except as provided in Section 8276.2 or 8277:

(a) Dungeness crab may be taken for commercial purposes in Districts 6, 7, 8, and 9 only between December 1 and July 15.

(b) Dungeness crab may be taken for commercial purposes in all other districts only between November 15 and June 30.

(c) Dungeness crab may not be taken for commercial purposes in any district, or part of a district, lying within the portions of Crescent City Harbor between the south sand barrier and the breakwater.

(d) All
 Dungeness crab traps shall be removed from state waters by 11:59 p.m. on the last day of the applicable Dungeness crab season.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 663, Sec. 2.   (SB 1310)   Effective September 21, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

8276.1.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “California Dungeness Crab Fishing Gear Working Group” means the California Dungeness Crab Fishing Gear Working Group established by the department, in partnership with the Ocean Protection Council and the National Marine Fisheries Service, on September 21, 2015, and as defined by its most recent charter as it may be amended from time to time.

(2) “Risk assessment and mitigation program” means the program developed by the California Dungeness Crab Fishing Gear Working Group, as that program may be amended from time to time until the regulations are adopted pursuant to subdivision (b), to identify and assess elevated levels of
 entanglement risk and determine the need for management options to reduce the risk of entanglement.

(b) The department, in consultation with the California Dungeness Crab Fishing Gear Working Group and other stakeholders, shall adopt regulations establishing criteria and protocols to evaluate and respond to the potential risk of marine life entanglement. The regulations shall include, but are not limited to, the risk assessment and mitigation program, and the use of alternative gear only after the season is open pursuant to the risk assessment and
 mitigation program that may otherwise be prohibited as prescribed by the department.
 Upon the effective date of the regulations, the director may restrict the take of Dungeness crab pursuant to the protocols and criteria.

(c) Unless otherwise prescribed by regulation, it is unlawful to take or possess Dungeness crab from any waters closed, or otherwise violate any restriction on take imposed, pursuant to this section.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 876, Sec. 12.   (SB 500)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8276.2.

(a) The director may order a delay in the opening of the Dungeness crab fishery after December 1 in Districts 6, 7, 8, and 9 in any year. The delay in the opening shall not be later than January 15 of any year.

(b) (1) On or about November 1 of each year, the director may authorize one or more operators of commercial fishing vessels to take and land a limited number of Dungeness crab for the purpose of quality testing according to a testing program conducted by, or on behalf of, the Pacific States Marine Fisheries Commission or an entity approved by the department.

(2) (A) The
 meat extracted from Dungeness crab tested pursuant to paragraph (1) may be sold by the entity approved by the department and revenues from that sale may be used for purposes of managing the testing program. Revenues shall be deposited in an account managed and overseen by the Pacific States Marine Fisheries Commission.

(B) For purposes of the testing program, the department shall develop guidelines after consulting with representatives of the California Dungeness crab industry, which shall include California delegates to the Tri-State Dungeness Crab Commission or members of the California Dungeness Crab Task Force, or both. The guidelines shall include the following:

(i) Suggested guidelines for the management of the funds received from, but not limited to, the sale of the crab meat
 pursuant to subparagraph (A), including the suggested guideline that funds in excess of the program costs may be donated for charitable purposes.

(ii) Guidelines for the testing program.

(iii) Guidelines that establish measures to track crab caught for purposes of the testing program, including, but not limited to, the guideline that all crab caught and sold for the testing program shall be canned.

(c) The director shall order the opening of the Dungeness crab season in Districts 6, 7, 8, and 9 on December 1 if the quality tests authorized in subdivision (b) indicate the Dungeness crabs are not soft-shelled or low quality. The entity authorized to conduct the approved testing program may test, or cause to be
 tested, crabs taken for quality and soft shells pursuant to the approved testing program. If the tests are conducted on or about November 1 and result in a finding that Dungeness crabs are soft-shelled or low quality, the director shall authorize a second test to be conducted on or about November 15 pursuant to the approved testing program. If the second test results in a finding that Dungeness crabs are soft-shelled or low quality, the director may order the season opening delayed for a period of 15 days and may authorize a third test to be conducted on or about December 1. If the third test results in a finding that Dungeness crabs remain soft-shelled or of low quality, the director may order the season opening delayed for a period of an additional 15 days and authorize a fourth test to be conducted. This procedure may continue to be followed, except that tests shall not be conducted after
 January 15 for that season, and the season opening shall not be delayed by the director later than January 15.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on April 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 663, Sec. 3.   (SB 1310)   Effective September 21, 2018.   Inoperative April 1, 2029.    Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8276.3.

(a) If there is any delay ordered by the director pursuant to Section 8276.2 in the opening of the Dungeness crab fishery in Districts 6, 7, 8, and 9, a vessel shall not take or land crab within Districts 6, 7, 8, and 9 during any closure.

(b) If there is any delay in the opening of the Dungeness crab season pursuant to Section 8276.2, the opening date in Districts 6, 7, 8, and 9 shall be preceded by a 64-hour gear setting period, as ordered by the director.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on April 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes
 operative on or before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 663, Sec. 4.   (SB 1310)   Effective September 21, 2018.   Inoperative April 1, 2029.    Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8276.4.

(a) The Ocean Protection Council shall make a grant, upon appropriation of funding by the Legislature, for the development and administration of a Dungeness crab task force. The membership of the Dungeness crab task force shall be comprised of all of the following:

(1) Two nonvoting members representing the department, appointed by the department.

(2) One nonvoting representative of the University of California Sea Grant, appointed by the University of California Sea Grant.

(3) Seven members appointed by the Chair of the Ocean Protection Council following a public solicitation for nominations, as follows:

(A) One voting and one nonvoting member representing sport fishing interests.

(B) Two voting members representing crab processing interests.

(C) One voting member representing commercial passenger fishing vessel interests.

(D) Two nonvoting members representing nongovernmental organization interests.

(4) Seventeen voting members representing commercial fishery interests, elected by licensed persons possessing valid Dungeness crab permits in their respective ports and production levels, as follows:

(A) Three members from Crescent City.

(B) One member from
 Trinidad.

(C) Two members from Eureka.

(D) Two members from Fort Bragg.

(E) Two members from Bodega Bay.

(F) Two members from San Francisco.

(G) Two members from Half Moon Bay.

(H) Two members from ports south of Half Moon Bay.

(I) One member who has a valid California nonresident crab permit.

(b) (1) Elected members in each port shall represent the following production levels:

(A) For ports with one elected
 member, the member shall represent both the upper and lower production levels.

(B) For ports with two elected members, one member shall represent the upper production level and one member shall represent the lower production level.

(C) For ports with three elected members, one member shall represent the upper production level, one member shall represent the lower production level, and one member shall represent both the upper and lower production levels.

(2) Upper and lower production levels shall be determined in relation to the average landing, during the five-year period before the beginning of an election cycle, of valid crab permitholders who landed a minimum of 25,000 pounds of crab during that period.

(c) Elections shall be held every three years
 in each port, on a staggered basis across ports, in coordination with the department or the Ocean Protection Council and with support from an administrative team of the Dungeness crab task force. In an election year, all elected members in a port shall be subject to reelection. There is no limit on the number of terms that may be served by any person.

(d) (1) Each member appointed pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) shall select an alternate to serve and, if applicable, vote in the member’s place in case of the member’s absence from, or disqualification from participating in, a meeting of the task force. If the position of a member appointed pursuant to one of those paragraphs becomes vacant, the alternate member shall serve until the position is filled as required pursuant to that paragraph.

(2) Each elected member shall select an
 alternate in the same port and production level to serve and vote in the member’s place in case of the member’s absence from, or disqualification from participating in, a meeting of the task force. If the position of the member becomes vacant, the alternate shall serve and vote in the member’s place until the next election is held in the port pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) The Dungeness crab task force shall do all of the following:

(1) Review and evaluate the commercial Dungeness crab management measures described in Section 8276.5, and make recommendations to the Joint Committee on Fisheries and Aquaculture, the department, and the commission, no later than January 15, 2022, and by January 15 of every third year thereafter through 2028.

(2) Make recommendations by the dates specified in paragraph (1) on all of
 the following: the need for a permanent Dungeness crab advisory committee, the economic impact of the program described in Section 8276.5 on permitholders of different tiers and the economies of different ports, the cost of the program to the department, including enforcement costs, the viability of a buyout program for the permitholders described in subparagraph (G) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 8276.5, refining commercial Dungeness crab management, and the need for statutory changes to accomplish task force objectives.

(3) In considering commercial Dungeness crab management options, prioritize the review of pot limit restriction options, current and future commercial fishery effort, season modifications, essential fishery information needs, and short- and long-term objectives for improved management.

(f) The task force may establish subcommittees of specific
 user groups from the task force membership to focus on issues specific to commercial harvest or crab processing. The subcommittees shall report their recommendations, if any, to the task force.

(g) The Ocean Protection Council may include in a grant funding to cover department staffing costs, as well as travel costs for task force participants as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(h) Except as otherwise provided in Section 8276.5, a recommendation shall be forwarded to the Joint Committee on Fisheries and Aquaculture, the department, and the commission upon an affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the voting members of the task force.

(i) Eligibility to take crab in state waters and offshore for commercial purposes may be subject to restrictions, including, but not limited to, restrictions on the
 number of traps utilized by that person, if either of the following occurs:

(1) A person holds a California Dungeness crab permit with California landings of less than 5,000 pounds between November 15, 2003, and July 15, 2008, inclusive, as reported in California landings receipts.

(2) A person has purchased a Dungeness crab permit on or after July 15, 2008, from a permitholder whose California landings were less than 5,000 pounds between November 15, 2003, and July 15, 2008, inclusive, as reported in California landings receipts.

(j) This section shall become inoperative on April 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 757, Sec. 4.   (SB 80)   Effective October 9, 2021.   Inoperative April 1, 2029.    Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8276.5.

(a) In consultation with the Dungeness crab task force, or its appointed representatives, the director shall adopt a program, by March 31, 2013, for Dungeness crab trap limits for all California permits. Unless the director finds that there is consensus in the Dungeness crab industry that modifications to the following requirements are more desirable, with evidence of consensus, including, but not limited to, the record of the Dungeness crab task force, the program shall include all of the following requirements:

(1) The program shall contain seven tiers of Dungeness crab trap limits based on California landings receipts under California permits between November 15, 2003, and July 15, 2008, as follows:

(A) The 55 California permits with the highest California landings shall receive a maximum allocation of 500 trap tags.

(B) The 55 California permits with the next highest California landings to those in subparagraph (A) shall receive a maximum allocation of 450 trap tags.

(C) The 55 California permits with the next highest California landings to those in subparagraph (B) shall receive a maximum allocation of 400 trap tags.

(D) The 55 California permits with the next highest California landings to those in subparagraph (C) shall receive a maximum allocation of 350 trap tags.

(E) The 55 California permits with the next highest California landings to those in subparagraph (D) shall receive a maximum allocation of 300 trap tags.

(F) The remaining California permits with the next highest California landings to those in subparagraph (E), which are not described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 8276.4, shall receive a maximum allocation of 250 trap tags.
